Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1382.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5009.6A of Title 56, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Oklahoma Health Care Authority shall pursue policies and


programs to assist members of the state Medicaid program in


preventing or delaying the onset of type 2 diabetes.



Req. No. 3291 Page 1


B. 1. The Authority shall establish the “Diabetes Prevention


Program” (DPP) within the fee-for-service and managed care delivery


systems of the state Medicaid program.


2. Each contracted entity shall make the DPP available to


enrolled members in accordance with this section.


3. The DPP shall be an evidence-based, lifestyle change program


designed to prevent or delay the onset of type 2 diabetes among


individuals with prediabetes.


C. A Medicaid provider may identify and recommend participation


in the DPP to a member who meets the eligibility requirements of the


federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) Diabetes


Prevention Recognition Program.


D. In implementing the DPP, the Authority shall require that


Medicaid providers offering DPP services:


1. Comply with guidelines issued by the CDC and obtain CDC


recognition in connection with the National Diabetes Prevention


Program; and


2. Use a CDC-approved lifestyle change curriculum that does all


of the following:


a. emphasizes self-monitoring, self-efficacy, and


problem-solving,


b. provides for coach feedback,


c. includes participant materials to support program


goals, and

Req. No. 3291 Page 2


d. requires participant weigh-ins to track and achieve


program goals.


E. DPP services shall be provided by peer coaches who shall


promote realistic lifestyle changes, emphasize weight loss through


healthy eating and physical activity, and implement the DPP


curriculum. A trained peer coach may be a physician, a nonphysician


practitioner, or an unlicensed person who has been trained to


deliver the required curriculum content and possesses the skills,


knowledge, and qualities specified in the National Diabetes


Prevention Program guidelines.


F. A member who participates in the DPP shall be allowed to


participate in twenty-two peer coaching sessions over a period of at


least one (1) year. Thereafter, the Authority shall provide a


participating member who achieves and maintains a required minimum


weight loss of five percent (5%) from the first core session, in


accordance with CDC standards, with less intensive, ongoing


maintenance sessions to help the member continue healthy behaviors.


G. 1. The Authority shall develop payment methodologies, or


adjust existing methodologies, for reimbursing DPP services and


activities in the Medicaid fee-for-service delivery system, not to


exceed eighty percent (80%) of the federal Medicare program


reimbursement for comparable service, billing, and diagnosis codes


under the federal Medicare program.



Req. No. 3291 Page 3


2. For purposes of reimbursement under the Medicaid fee-for-


service delivery system, an unlicensed peer coach shall have an


arrangement with a participating Medicaid provider for purposes of


reimbursement for rendered DPP services.


H. This section shall be implemented only to the extent that


the Authority obtains federal financial participation to the extent


permitted by federal law, and obtains any necessary federal


approvals.


I. For the purposes of implementing this section, the Authority


may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts on a bid or


negotiated basis, including contracts for the purpose of obtaining


subject matter expertise or other technical assistance. A contract


may be statewide or on a limited geographic basis. A contract


entered into or amended pursuant to this section shall be exempt


from the Oklahoma Central Purchasing Act.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3291 DC 12/30/2025 6:01:25 PM













Req. No. 3291 Page 4